Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Special Designations of Portions of Highway System and Bridges
§ 65-3-71.181.
“William R. ‘Bill’ Minor Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of highway that is designated as U.S. Highway 78 and will be redesignated as Interstate 22 beginning at the Marshall/DeSoto county line and extending to the Benton/Union county line shall be known and designated as the “William R. ‘Bill’ Minor Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 332, § 1; 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.182.
“Kevser Ermin Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 314 in Lafayette County beginning at its intersection with County Road 102 and extending northwesterly for a distance of four and one-half (4-1/2) miles, is designated and shall be known as the “Kevser Ermin Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.183.
“John Wayne Haddock Memorial Interchange” designated.

The Interstate Highway 55 and Mississippi Highway 8 interchange in Grenada County is designated and shall be known as the “John Wayne Haddock Memorial Interchange.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 358, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.184.
“Anse Dees Memorial Bypass” designated.

The U.S. Highway 82 bypass within Washington County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Anse Dees Memorial Bypass.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the bypass.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.185.
“F. Wade Lambert Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 30 Bypass in Prentiss County and the City of Booneville, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with U.S. Highway 45 and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 30, is designated and shall be known as the “F. Wade Lambert Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.186.
“Robert L. Johnson Blues Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Interstate Highway 55 in Copiah County beginning at mile marker 59 and extending northerly to mile marker 72, is designated and shall be known as the “Robert L. Johnson Blues Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 535, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.187.
“Richard Alexandra ‘Dickie’ Ware Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 15 North in Jasper County beginning at the Mississippi Army National Guard Armory and ending at the northern corporate limits of the City of Bay Springs is designated and shall be known as the Richard Alexandra “Dickie” Ware Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 541, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.188.
“SFC Severin West Summers III Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 61 South in Adams County beginning at its intersection with Kingston Road and extending southerly to its intersection with Hutchins Landing Road, is designated and shall be known as the “SFC Severin West Summers III Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 541, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.189.
Mississippi Highway 6 in Lafayette County designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

That segment of Mississippi Highway 6 within Lafayette County, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 541, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.190.
“Robert L. ‘Bob’ Crook Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 8 in Sunflower County from the city limits of Ruleville, Mississippi, to the east side of the Sunflower River Bridge is designated and shall be known as the Robert L. “Bob” Crook Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of Mississippi Highway 8.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 541, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.191.
“Mississippi Heritage Highway” designated.

U.S. Highway 82 in the State of Mississippi is designated and shall be known as the “Mississippi Heritage Highway.”

The municipalities and counties along the highway shall designate historical sites and events along the Mississippi Heritage Highway to offer to tourists and targeted groups a structured tour of historical sites and events.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall purchase appropriate Mississippi Heritage Highway markers from any of its available funds.The texts for the historical markers shall be approved by the department and the department shall erect and maintain the markers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 541, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.192.
“Veterans’ Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 15 within Chickasaw County and the corporate limits of the City of Houston is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans’ Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 408, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-71.193.
“Blue Star Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 25 and Mississippi 15 that converges and overlaps within the corporate limits of the City of Louisville, Mississippi, is designated as “Blue Star Memorial Highway” in honor and in gratitude and appreciation for the contributions and sacrifices of the Armed Forces that have defended the United States of America.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect suitable markers along that portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2013).

§ 65-3-71.194.
Mississippi Highway 6 in Lee County designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

That segment of Mississippi Highway 6 within Lee County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 317, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.195.
“Tyler R. Kilsby and Leon Sims Memorial Highway” designated.

That reconstructed segment of Mississippi Highway 11 in Lamar County beginning where Mississippi Highway 11 intersects the Norfolk Southern Railroad and extending one thousand eight hundred forty feet (1,840) is designated and shall be known as the Tyler R. Kilsby and Leon Sims Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 326, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.196.
“Carlos ‘Coach’ McDaniel Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 590 from U.S. Interstate 59 east to Augusta Road including the Highway 590/29 Bypass in Jones County, is designated and shall be known as the Carlos “Coach” McDaniel Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 326, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.197.
“Senator George Cecil McLeod, Jr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 63 beginning at the boundary between George County and Greene County and extending northerly to the overpass at Mississippi Highway 163 is designated and shall be known as the “Senator George Cecil McLeod, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.198.
Mississippi Highway 6 in Panola County designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

That segment of Mississippi Highway 6 within Panola County, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 337, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2013).

§ 65-3-71.199.
“Wyonie ‘Sonny’ Patterson Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 29 (Holly Street) beginning at the intersection with U.S. Highway 11 and extending southeasterly to the intersection with Church Street is designated and shall be known as the “Wyonie ‘Sonny’ Patterson Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.200.
“Lawrence County Veterans Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 184 beginning at the intersection with U.S. Highway 84 west of the City of Monticello and extending to the intersection with U.S. Highway 84 east of the City of Monticello is designated and shall be known as the “Lawrence County Veterans Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.201.
Bridge in City of Natchez designated “Veterans Memorial Bridge.”

That flyover bridge in the Mississippi Department of Transportation Project at the intersection of U.S. Highway 61 and Devereaux Drive in the City of Natchez in Adams County is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at each end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 377, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2013).

§ 65-3-71.202.
“Sergeant Jonathan W. Lambert, U.S.M.C. Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 4 within Prentiss County, Mississippi, beginning at the Prentiss/Tishomingo County line and extending to the intersection of Mississippi Highway 4 and Mississippi Highway 371 is designated and shall be known as the “Sergeant Jonathan W. Lambert, U.S.M.C. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 373, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.203.
“Adam Lee Weisenberger Memorial Interchange” designated.

The Gluckstadt interchange on Interstate 55 in Madison County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Adam Lee Weisenberger Memorial Interchange.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.204.
“Arwilla Huff Davison Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate Highway 59 located in Jones County from the Jones/Jasper County line southerly to the Beacon Street exit within the City of Laurel is designated and shall be known as the “Arwilla Huff Davison Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs, both within Jones County and within the City of Laurel, along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 544, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2016, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.205.
“Representative William E. ‘Billy’ Bowles Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge on Mississippi Highway 15 in Chickasaw County within the City of Houston at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 8 is designated and shall be known as the “Representative William E. ‘Billy’ Bowles Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs and markers along and approaching, and at each end of, the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 561, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-71.206.
“Jesse Brent Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Mississippi Highway 82 in Washington County that spans the Mississippi River is designated and shall be known as the “Jesse Brent Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at the Mississippi end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 329, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.207.
“Oliver Wendell Pinson Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 364 in Prentiss County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 365 and extending to its intersection with County Road 2201 is designated and shall be known as the “Oliver Wendell Pinson Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of Mississippi Highway 364.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.208.
“Deputy Chief W.T. ‘Bill’ Martin Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 51 within Madison County, Mississippi, beginning at the corporate limits of the City of Madison and extending to the intersection of Mississippi Highway 51 and Yandell Road is designated and shall be known as the Deputy Chief W.T. “Bill” Martin Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 313, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.209.
Mississippi Highway 6 within the State of Mississippi designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway.”

Mississippi Highway 6 within the State of Mississippi is designated and shall be known as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart Highway” in honor and gratitude and appreciation for the contributions made by veterans of this state in the defense of and service to this country.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.210.
Mississippi Highway 492 in the Town of Union designated “Blue Star Memorial Highway.”

That section of Mississippi Highway 492 within the corporate limits of the Town of Union, Mississippi, is designated as the “Blue Star Memorial Highway” in honor and in gratitude and appreciation for the contributions and sacrifices of the Armed Forces that have defended the United States of America.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect suitable markers along that portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 327, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.211.
Mississippi Highway 32 in Chickasaw County designated “Veterans Memorial Boulevard.”

That segment of Mississippi Highway 32 in Chickasaw County beginning at the city limits of Okolona and running east to the Monroe County line is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans Memorial Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of Mississippi Highway 32.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 334, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.212.
“Chief Randy Boykin Memorial Intersection” designated.

The intersection on Mississippi Highway 513 and River Road in the Town of Enterprise in Clarke County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Chief Randy Boykin Memorial Intersection.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the intersection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.213.
“J.B. Ivy Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge that spans the Pearl River on Mississippi Highway 44 in Marion County is designated and shall be known as the “J.B. Ivy Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2014).

§ 65-3-71.214.
“Representative David Gibbs Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 45 Alternate beginning at the intersection with Mississippi Highway 50 and extending northerly to its intersection with the Monroe County line is designated and shall be known as the “Representative David Gibbs Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.215.
“Broderick Rashad Danti Dixon Intersection” designated.

The intersection on Mississippi Highway 18 and Siwell Road in Hinds County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Broderick Rashad Danti Dixon Intersection.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the intersection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.216.
“Tommy Bryan Hosey Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Jasper County beginning at its intersection with County Road 1511 and extending southerly to its intersection with County Road 151131 is designated and shall be known as the “Tommy Bryan Hosey Memorial Highway” in memory of the first Jasper County resident killed in Vietnam during the Vietnam War.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2014).

§ 65-3-71.217.
“Sergeant John E. Wells Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 63 in Jackson County beginning at its intersection with Freeman Road and extending southerly for one (1) mile is designated and shall be known as the “Sergeant John E. Wells Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 2014).

§ 65-3-71.218.
“Phyllis A. Graham-Steven B. Moss Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 9 in Choctaw County, Mississippi, beginning at the Choctaw-Webster County Line and extending southerly to the corporate limits of the Town of Ackerman is designated and shall be known as the “Phyllis A. Graham-Steven B. Moss Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 406, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 2014).

§ 65-3-71.219.
“Keith Alan Crenshaw Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of United States Highway 82 in Webster County beginning at its easternmost intersection with Mississippi Highway 182 and extending westerly to its westernmost intersection with Mississippi Highway 182 is designated and shall be known as the “Keith Alan Crenshaw Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 485, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.220.
“Anthony Lucas Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Choctaw County beginning at a point located three thousand four hundred (3,400) feet south of its intersection with West Reform-Sturgis Road and East Reform-Sturgis Road and extending northerly for six thousand six hundred (6,600) feet to a point three thousand two hundred (3,200) feet north of its intersection with West Reform-Sturgis Road and East Reform-Sturgis Road is designated and shall be known as the “Anthony Lucas Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 485, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.221.
“William Faulkner Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 30 in Union County beginning in the City of New Albany at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 178 and extending westerly to its intersection with the Union-Lafayette County Line, is designated and shall be known as the “William Faulkner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 485, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.222.
“MSgt. Scott E. Pruitt Memorial Highway” designated.”

That segment of U.S. Highway 90 in Jackson County within the City of Gautier beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 57 and extending easterly to its intersection with Beasley Road, is designated and shall be known as the “MSgt. Scott E. Pruitt Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 485, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 401, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.223.
“John Lewis ‘Louie’ Pitts Memorial Highway” designated.

That section of U.S. Highway 84 in Wayne County beginning from the West Shady Grove Church Road and extending westerly to the intersection of U.S. Highway 84 and Eucutta Road is designated and shall be known as the “John Lewis ‘Louie’ Pitts Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that section of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 478, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.224.
“Bond-Breland-Fite Memorial Highway” designated.

That section of Mississippi Highway 26 within the corporate limits of the City of Wiggins, Mississippi, beginning from First Street and extending easterly to the corporate limits of the City of Wiggins is designated and shall be known as the “Bond-Breland-Fite Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that section of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 478, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.225.
“Tommy Johnson Blues Memorial Highway” designated.

That section of U.S. Highway 51 in Copiah County within the corporate limits of the City of Crystal Springs beginning from its intersection with Mississippi Highway 27 and extending southerly to its intersection with Pat Harrison Drive is designated and shall be known as the “Tommy Johnson Blues Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that section of highway designated in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 478, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.226.
“Lt. Vicky Baldwin Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 305 in DeSoto County beginning at the intersection of Bell Forrest Drive and extending to its intersection with College Road is designated and shall be known as the “Lt. Vicky Baldwin Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 478, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.227.
“Roy B. Fulton Highway” designated.

That section of U.S. Highway 82 in Washington County beginning at the corporate limits of the City of Greenville going southward to the new Highway 82 bridge crossing the Mississippi River is designated and shall be known as the “Roy B. Fulton Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that section of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.228.
“Dr. Donald W. Zacharias Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 25 in Oktibbeha County beginning at its intersection with Old Highway 25 and extending southerly to its intersection with the Oktibbeha-Winston County Line, is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Donald W. Zacharias Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 485, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 65-3-71.229.
“Chief William ‘Bill’ Lott Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 49 West in Sunflower County, Mississippi, beginning at its northern-most intersection with Mississippi Highway 442 and extending northerly therefrom on U.S. Highway 49 West for a distance of one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as the “Chief William ‘Bill’ Lott Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.230.
“Jasper County Veterans Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 528 extending westerly from U.S. Interstate 59 to its intersection with Jasper County Road 17 is designated and shall be known as the Jasper County Veterans Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching and along this segment of Mississippi Highway 528.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.231.
“Mack Jordan Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 84 in Covington County beginning at its intersection with Salem School Road and Mississippi Highway 588 and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 37, is designated and shall be known as the “Mack Jordan Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway. The signs shall include the words “Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient,” pursuant to the Mississippi Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient’s Memorial Highway Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.232.
“Coach Morris Brown Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Jones County beginning at the city limits of Laurel, Mississippi, and extending northerly to its intersection with Trace Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Coach Morris Brown Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 371, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.233.
U.S. Highway 72 in Tishomingo, Alcorn, Tippah, Benton and Marshall Counties, Mississippi, designated the “Veterans Memorial Highway.”

The entire segment of U.S. Highway 72 in Tishomingo, Alcorn, Tippah, Benton and Marshall Counties, Mississippi, beginning at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line, and ending at the Mississippi-Alabama state line, is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 362, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.234.
“Marc Lee Whatley Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Jones County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Trace Road and extending northerly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 537, is designated and shall be known as the “Marc Lee Whatley Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 389, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.235.
“Agent Kimbrough ‘Kim’ Sterling Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 24 in Amite County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Enterprise Road and extending westerly to its intersection with Hinton Road is designated and shall be known as the “Agent Kimbrough ‘Kim’ Sterling Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.236.
“Agent Harold Lane Caldwell Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 2 in Alcorn County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Gaines Road and extending westerly to its intersection with Airport Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Agent Harold Lane Caldwell Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 388, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.237.
“Charles Foster Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge that spans the Coldwater River on Mississippi Highway 309 in Marshall County is designated and shall be known as the “Charles Foster Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.238.
“Alan Smith and Dennis Rushing Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 63 in Greene County beginning at the ambulance response station, which is near the community of Sand Hill, and extending northerly to the Wayne County line is designated and shall be known as the “Alan Smith and Dennis Rushing Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.239.
“Will Roy Dantzler Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 528 in Jasper County beginning at its intersection with Interstate 59 and extending easterly to its intersection with U.S. Highway 11 is designated and shall be known as the “Will Roy Dantzler Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.240.
“Hank McLeod Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 25 in Oktibbeha County beginning at its intersection with McGee Road and extending southerly to its intersection with St. Marks Drive is designated and shall be known as the “Hank McLeod Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 377, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.241.
“Corporal Michael Brandon Presley Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 51 in Panola County beginning at its intersection with Pope-Water Valley Road and extending southerly to its intersection with Enid Dam Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Corporal Michael Brandon Presley Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 387, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.242.
“Peyton Coleman Flowers Memorial Highway” designated.

The following segments of Mississippi Highway 550 shall be designated as the “Peyton Coleman Flowers Memorial Highway”:

The segment beginning at the eastern most point of the school zone near Loyd Star Attendance Center and extending one (1) mile easterly; and

The segment beginning at the western most point of the school zone near Loyd Star Attendance Center and extending one (1) mile westerly.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.243.
“James C. ‘Jimmy’ Pharr Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 371 within the corporate limits of the Town of Marietta in Prentiss County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the James C. “Jimmy” Pharr Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of Mississippi Highway 371.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.244.
Mississippi Highway 8 in the City of Grenada, Mississippi, designated “Blue Star Memorial Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 8 within the corporate limits of the City of Grenada, Mississippi, is designated as “Blue Star Memorial Highway” in honor and in gratitude and appreciation for the contributions and sacrifices of the Armed Forces that have defended the United States of America.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect suitable markers along that portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.245.
“Terry W. Brown Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge which spans the Tennessee-Tombigbee Waterway on U.S. Highway 82 in Lowndes County adjacent to the corporate limits of Columbus, Mississippi, shall be designated and shall be known as the “Terry W. Brown Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs at each end of the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.246.
“William Faulkner Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 30 extending from the Lafayette/Union County line to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 7 within the corporate limits of the City of Oxford, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the William Faulkner Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching and along this segment of Mississippi Highway 30.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.247.
“Senator Bennie L. Turner Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 45 Alternate in Clay County beginning at the intersection with Mississippi Highway 50 and extending southerly to its intersection with the Lowndes County line is designated and shall be known as the “Senator Bennie L. Turner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.248.
“Dr. Michael Lee Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Kiln Delisle Road between Silver Creek Road and Koch Ranch Road that is part of the state highway system in Hancock County is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Michael Lee Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of Kiln Delisle Road.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.249.
“Rev. Dan Alexander Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 555, also known as Martin Luther King, Jr. Road, in Adams County beginning at its intersection with Broadmoor Drive and extending northerly to its intersection with Steamplant Road is designated and shall be known as the “Rev. Dan Alexander Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.250.
“Spencer Glenn Beckley Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 9 in Calhoun County beginning at its intersection with County Road 406 and extending northerly to its intersection with Pittsboro Park Road is designated and shall be known as the “Spencer Glenn Beckley Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 401, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.